Idaho, session 2025, S1117.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 34-1812, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-1812. FISCAL IMPACT STATEMENTS. (1) After receiving a copy of an
initiative petition from the secretary of state as provided in section
34-1804, Idaho Code, the division of financial management, in consultation
with any other appropriate state or local agency, shall prepare an unbiased,
good faith statement of the fiscal impact of the law proposed by the ini-
tiative. The division of financial management shall complete the initial
fiscal impact statement and file it with the secretary of state's office
within twenty (20) working days of having received the initiative petition
from the secretary of state's office. The secretary of state shall immedi-
ately transmit a copy of the initial fiscal impact statement to the person or
persons who filed the initiative petition pursuant to section 34-1804, Idaho
Code.
(2) If the person or persons who filed the initiative petition modify
the initiative petition pursuant to section 34-1809(2), Idaho Code, after
receiving the certificate of review and initial fiscal impact statement, the
secretary of state shall notify the division of financial management of the
modified initiative petition. Within ten (10) working days, the division of
financial management shall either submit an updated fiscal impact statement
to the secretary of state's office reflecting such modifications or notify
the secretary of state that the modifications did not alter the fiscal impact
of the law proposed by the initiative petition reflected in the initial fis-
cal impact statement.
(2) (3) A fiscal impact statement shall describe any projected increase
or decrease in revenues, costs, expenditures, or indebtedness that the state
or local governments will experience if the ballot measure is approved by the
voters. The A fiscal impact statement shall include both immediate expected
fiscal impacts and an estimate of any state or local government long-term fi-
nancial implications. A fiscal impact statement must be written in clear and
concise language and shall avoid legal and technical terms whenever possi-
ble. Where appropriate, a fiscal impact statement may include both esti-
mated dollar amounts and a description placing the estimated dollar amounts
into context.


(3) (4) A fiscal impact statement must include both a summary of the
fiscal impact statement, not to exceed one hundred (100) words, and a more
detailed statement of fiscal impact that includes the assumptions that were
made to develop the fiscal impact statement. When collecting signatures,
a signature gatherer shall offer a copy of the fiscal impact statement sum-
mary, along with a copy of the initiative and the sponsor's proposed funding
source information, to the elector for review before signing.
(5) No later than July 20 in the year an initiative petition with the
requisite number of signatures attached has been properly filed with the
secretary of state pursuant to section 34-1802(4), Idaho Code, the division
of financial management shall file with the secretary of state a final fiscal
impact statement, updated with the most accurate and up-to-date information
concerning the fiscal impact of the law proposed by such initiative peti-
tion. The secretary of state shall immediately transmit a copy of the final
fiscal impact statement to the person or persons who filed the initiative
petition pursuant to section 34-1804, Idaho Code.
(6) The final fiscal impact statement summary and the sponsor's pro-
posed funding source information shall also be published in the state vot-
ers' pamphlet and on the official ballot. The final fiscal impact statement
summary, and the detailed fiscal impact statement, pursuant to subsection
(4) of this section and the sponsor's proposed funding source information
shall be made available to the public on the secretary of state's website no
later than August 1.
(4) (7) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a city or
county ballot initiative.
SECTION 2. That Section 34-1812A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-1812A. ARGUMENTS CONCERNING INITIATIVE AND REFERENDUM MEA-
SURES. Any voter or group of voters may on or before July 20 31 prepare and
file an argument, not to exceed five hundred (500) words, for or against any
measure. Such argument shall not be accepted unless accompanied by the name
and address or names and addresses of the person or persons submitting it,
or, if submitted on behalf of an organization, the name and address of the
organization and the names and addresses of at least two (2) of its principal
officers.
If more than one (1) argument for or more than one (1) argument against
any measure is filed within the time prescribed, the secretary of state shall
select one (1) of the arguments for printing in the voters' pamphlets. In se-
lecting the argument the secretary of state shall be required to give prior-
ity in the order named to the arguments of the following:
(1) The proponent of the initiative or referendum petition.
(2) Bona fide associations of citizens.
(3) Individual voters.
SECTION 3. That Section 34-1812B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-1812B. SUBMISSION OF REBUTTAL ARGUMENTS. When the secretary of
state has received the arguments which will be printed in the voters' pam-


phlet, the secretary of state shall immediately send copies of the arguments
in favor of the proposition to the authors of the arguments against and
copies of the arguments against to the authors of the arguments in favor. The
authors may prepare and submit rebuttal arguments not exceeding two hundred
and fifty (250) words. The rebuttal arguments must be filed no later than
August 1 10. Rebuttal arguments shall be printed in the same manner as the
direct arguments. Each rebuttal argument shall immediately follow the di-
rect argument which it seeks to rebut.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.